Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Tax on Liquefied Petroleum Gas Used as Motor Fuel

234.310.
Definitions for KRS 234.310 to 234.440.

As used in KRS

234.310

to

234.440

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Department” means the Department of Revenue;

“Person” includes every natural person, fiduciary, association, state, or political subdivision, or corporation. Whenever used in any clause prescribing and imposing imprisonment the term “person” as applied to an association means and includes the partners or members thereof, and as applied to corporations, the officers thereof;

“Liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel” means and includes all combustible gases and liquids as described in KRS

234.100

used for the generation of power in an internal combustion engine to propel vehicles of any kind upon the public highways;

“Motor vehicle” means any vehicle, machine or mechanical contrivance propelled by an internal combustion engine and licensed for operation and operated upon the public highways and any trailer or semitrailer attached to or having its front end supported by such motor vehicle;

“Public highways” means every way or place generally open to the use of the public as a matter of right for the purpose of vehicular travel, notwithstanding that they may be temporarily closed or travel thereon restricted for the purpose of construction, maintenance, repair or reconstruction;

“Liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer” means any person who imports or causes to be imported into this state for resale or use, or any person making sales in this state, of liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel for resale or use in this state by a licensed liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel user-seller;

“Liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel user-seller” means any person, not licensed as a liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer, who dispenses liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel into the fuel tanks of, or attached to, motor vehicles for the propulsion of such motor vehicles on the public highways, and shall include any such person who so dispenses liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel for consumption in such motor vehicles owned, leased, or operated by him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 2; 2005, ch. 85, § 634, effective June 20, 2005.

234.320.
Imposition of excise tax.

An excise tax at the rate levied in KRS 138.220(1) and (2) is hereby levied and shall be paid by the liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer to the department on all taxable liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel delivered to the licensed liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel user-seller or withdrawn by the liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer to propel motor vehicles on the public highways, either within or without this state. An allowance of one percent (1%) of the tax shall be made to the liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer to cover unaccountable losses, bad debts, and handling and reporting the tax.

No other excise or license tax shall be levied or assessed on liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel by any political subdivision of the state, except the licenses under KRS

234.120

.

No provision of KRS

234.310

to

234.440

shall in any way affect the surtax imposed on heavy equipment motor carriers under KRS

138.660

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 3; 1972, ch. 61, § 15; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 4; 1980, ch. 218, § 7, effective July 1, 1980; 1986, ch. 174, § 16, effective July 1, 1986; 2005, ch. 85, § 635, effective June 20, 2005.

234.321.
Collection of excise tax on liquefied petroleum gas — Exemptions.

The tax imposed by KRS

234.320

shall not be collected when the liquefied petroleum gas sold by the dealer is used to propel motor vehicles on the public highways, either within or without this state, when the motor vehicles using the liquefied petroleum gas are equipped with carburetion systems approved by the Energy and Environment Cabinet or a fuel system that meets federal vehicle safety standards contained in 49 C.F.R. pt. 571.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall establish emission standards for carburetion systems.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 103, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(6); 1976, ch. 324, § 1; 2010, ch. 24, § 512, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 116, § 10, effective June 25, 2013.

234.330.
Dealer’s license requirement.

A license shall be required of each liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer.

Application for a license shall be made to the department upon forms prepared and furnished by the department. The application shall contain such information as the department deems necessary.

Concurrently with the filing of an application for a license, a liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer shall file with the department a bond as required under KRS

234.340

. No license shall be issued to any person unless such person has furnished a bond as provided in KRS

234.340

to secure payment of taxes, penalties and interest imposed by KRS

234.310

to

234.440

.

The application in proper form having been accepted for filing, the bond, if required, having been accepted and approved and the other conditions and requirements of this section having been complied with, the department shall issue a license. However, if an application for a license is filed by any person whose license has at any time previously been revoked for cause by the department, or if the department is of the opinion that the person who makes the application as a subterfuge for the real party in interest whose license, prior to the time of filing the application, has been revoked for cause, or that the application is not for any other reason filed in good faith or is not for sufficient cause, the department may, after a hearing of which the applicant shall be given ten (10) days’ notice in writing and in which he shall have the right to appear in person or by counsel and present testimony, refuse to issue a license to that person.

All licenses shall be valid and remain in full force and effect until suspended or revoked for cause or otherwise canceled.

A license shall not be assignable or transferable and shall be valid only for the person in whose name it is issued.

The department shall keep and file all applications and bonds, with an alphabetical index thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 4; 1984, ch. 113, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 2005, ch. 85, § 636, effective June 20, 2005.

234.340.
Dealer’s bond.

Every liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer shall file with the department a corporate bond, cash bond, or securities approved by the department in a minimum amount of five hundred dollars ($500) and in a maximum amount of four (4) months’ liability for taxes imposed under KRS

234.310

to

234.440

but not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). If, however, a liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer is bonded as provided in KRS

138.330

the department may waive the bonding requirement in this section provided a rider is attached to the bond to guarantee payment of all liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel taxes together with all penalties and interest thereon and secure faithful compliance with the provisions of KRS

234.310

to

234.440

. The applicant for a license shall be the principal obligor and this state shall be the obligee. The bond shall be conditioned upon the prompt filing of true reports and the payment by the licensee to the department of all taxes levied under KRS 234.310 to 234.440, together with all penalties and interest thereon and generally upon faithful compliance with the provisions of KRS 234.310 to 234.440.

If the liability upon the bond is discharged or reduced, whether by judgment rendered, payment made, or otherwise or if in the opinion of the department any surety has become unsatisfactory or unacceptable, the department may require the licensee to file a new bond with satisfactory surety in the same form and amount, failing which the department shall cancel the license in accordance with the provisions of this section. If a new bond is furnished by the licensee as above provided, the department shall cancel the bond for which the new bond is substituted.

If upon an informal hearing, of which the licensee shall be given ten (10) days’ notice in writing, the department decides that the amount of the existing bond is insufficient to insure payment to this state of the amount of the tax, penalties, and interest for which the licensee is or may become liable, the licensee shall, upon the written demand of the department, file an additional bond in the same manner and form with surety thereon approved by the department, in any amount determined by the department to be necessary, failing which the department shall cancel the license in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Any surety on a bond furnished by a licensee shall be released from all liability to this state accruing on the bond after the expiration of sixty (60) days from the date upon which the surety has lodged with the department a written request to be released, but this request shall not operate to release the surety from any liability already accrued or which shall accrue before the expiration of the sixty (60) day period. The department shall, promptly on the receipt of the request, notify the licensee who furnished the bond, and unless the licensee shall, before the expiration of the sixty (60) day period, file with the department a new bond with surety satisfactory to the department in the amount and form prescribed in this section, the department shall cancel the license in accordance with the provisions of this section. If the new bond is furnished by the licensee as above provided, the department shall cancel the bond for which the new bond is substituted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 5; 1996, ch. 318, § 151, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 637, effective June 20, 2005.

234.350.
Surrender or cancellation of license.

If a licensee at any time files a false monthly report of the information required, or fails or refuses to file the monthly report or to pay the full amount of the tax or violates any other provision of KRS

234.310

to

234.440

, without a showing that the failure was due to reasonable cause, the department may cancel the license and suspend the privilege of acting as a liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer.

Upon voluntary surrender of the license or upon receipt of a written request by a licensee, the department may cancel his or her license, effective sixty (60) days from the date of request, but no license shall be canceled upon surrender or request unless the licensee has, prior to the date of cancellation, paid to this state all taxes, penalties, interest, and fines that are due or have accrued, and unless the licensee has surrendered to the department his or her license.

If upon investigation the department ascertains that any person to whom a license has been issued is no longer engaged as a liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer or a liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel user-seller, and has not been so engaged for a period of six (6) months, the department may cancel the license by giving the person sixty (60) days’ notice of cancellation, mailed to his or her last known address in which event the license shall be surrendered to the department.

Whenever a licensee ceases to engage in business within this state, he or she shall notify the department in writing within fifteen (15) days after discontinuance. All taxes that have accrued under KRS

234.310

to

234.440

, whether or not then due, shall become due and payable concurrently with the discontinuance. The licensee shall make a report and pay all such taxes and any interest and penalties thereon, and shall surrender to the department his or her license.

If the department takes action to cancel a license as provided in this section, the licensee shall be notified by certified or registered letter or summons of the charges against him or her, and he or she shall be afforded an opportunity for an informal hearing on the matter. The hearing shall be set at least five (5) days from the date the letter is delivered or the summons is served. Any licensee aggrieved by a decision to cancel his or her license after the informal hearing may appeal the decision to the Board of Tax Appeals pursuant to KRS

49.220

where he or she shall be granted an administrative hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

If the license is canceled by the department as provided in this section, and if the licensee has paid to this state all taxes, interest, and penalties under KRS

234.310

to

234.440

, the department shall cancel the bond filed by the licensee.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 6; 1996, ch. 318, § 152, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 638, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 74, § 96, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 85, effective June 29, 2021.

234.360.
Records that are required to be kept.

Every liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer licensee shall maintain complete records of inventories, purchases, sales, use and other dispositions of liquefied petroleum gas. Such records, together with manifests of lading, invoices, correspondence, and other papers pertaining to liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel shall be retained for a minimum of two (2) years, and if requested by the department, shall be made available for examination by the department.

Where storage of liquefied petroleum gas is for multiple uses, and where the number of gallons taxable of liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel is determined by the liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer and/or the liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel user-seller, based on the best estimate possible from mileage and efficiency records available, all mileage and efficiency records of such motor vehicle must be retained for a minimum period of two (2) years, and, if requested by the department, shall be made available for examination by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 7; 2005, ch. 85, § 639, effective June 20, 2005.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, KRS Ch. 13A.

234.370.
Dealer’s monthly return.

Every liquefied petroleum motor fuel dealer licensee shall file with the department, on forms prescribed by the department, a monthly tax return. The return shall be made under penalty of perjury and shall show such information as the department may require. The licensee shall file the return on or before the twenty-fifth day of the next succeeding calendar month following the month to which it relates.

The monthly tax return shall be accompanied by remittance covering the tax due.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 8; 1972, ch. 61, § 16; 2005, ch. 85, § 640, effective June 20, 2005.

234.380.
Computation of tax.

Liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealers using, selling, and/or delivering liquefied petroleum gas to motor vehicles, or into storage for use in motor vehicles, shall report and pay the state tax at the rate levied in KRS 138.220(1) and (2) on all such fuel to the Department of Revenue. The dealer shall issue an invoice to the customer whenever the sale or delivery is consummated giving the invoice date, name and address of the customer, and number of taxable gallons sold or delivered. The number of taxable gallons to be invoiced shall be determined in the following manner by the dealer:

The metered gallons, if placed into a fuel tank of a motor vehicle;

The metered gallons, if placed into storage, all of which is to be used or sold for use in motor vehicles;

The number of gallons to be used in motor vehicles, if the storage is for multiple uses. The number of taxable gallons to be determined by the user and the dealer based on the best estimate possible from mileage and efficiency records available; or

If the motor vehicle carburetor is connected to a fuel line leading from a fuel tank where another, or other motors are supplied with fuel also, then the number of gallons to be invoiced as taxable motor fuel shall be determined from mileage and fuel efficiency records.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 9; 1972, ch. 61, § 17; 1980, ch. 218, § 8, effective July 1, 1980; 1986, ch. 174, § 17, effective July 1, 1986; 2005, ch. 85, § 641, effective June 20, 2005.

234.390.
Use by user-seller in own vehicles.

Any holder of a liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel user-seller license, using liquefied petroleum gas as a motor fuel to propel motor vehicles upon the highways may fuel his own vehicles from storage where nontaxable liquefied petroleum gas is stored provided:

The state tax has been paid to the distributor or supplier of liquefied petroleum gas, who is licensed as a liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer, on that portion intended for use on the highway; and further provided that

The liquefied petroleum gas storage facilities meet the requirements of this chapter and regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 10.

234.400.
Department’s power to audit licensee’s books.

The department may audit the books and records of each licensee and make such other investigations as it deems necessary to determine whether or not the tax and other requirements imposed by KRS

234.310

to

234.440

have been met.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 11; 2005, ch. 85, § 642, effective June 20, 2005.

234.410.
Form of tax payment.

The reports required by KRS

234.370

shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier’s check payable to the State Treasurer, for the amount of tax due for the preceding calendar month computed as provided in KRS

234.380

, except that the department may waive this requirement and accept the check of the licensee if he is of sound financial condition and has established a good record of compliance with the requirements of KRS

234.310

to

234.440

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 12; 2005, ch. 85, § 643, effective June 20, 2005.

234.420.
Civil penalties for violation of KRS 234.370.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

234.370

shall be subject to the uniform civil penalties imposed pursuant to KRS

131.180

and interest at the tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010(6) shall be paid as a part of the tax.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 13; 1992, ch. 338, § 9, effective August 1, 1992; 1992, ch. 403, § 23, effective August 1, 1992.

234.430.
Prohibited actions.

With respect to KRS

234.310

to

234.440

, it is unlawful for any person to:

Fail to pay the taxes due;

Fail, neglect or refuse to make and file any statement required in the manner or within the time required;

Make any false statement or conceal any material fact in any record, report or affidavit;

Conduct any activities requiring a license without a license or after a license has been surrendered, canceled or revoked;

Assign or attempt to assign a license to act as a liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel dealer;

Violate any other provisions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 14.

234.440.
Administration of KRS 234.310 to 234.430 and this section.

The department shall administer the taxes provided in KRS

234.310

to

234.430

and this section and may prescribe, adopt and enforce regulations relating to the administration and enforcement thereof.

The department shall, upon the request of the officials to whom are entrusted the enforcement of the liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel tax law of any other state of the United States or the provinces of the Dominion of Canada, forward to such officials any information which it may have relative to the manufacture, receipt, sale, use, transportation, shipment, or delivery by any person of liquefied petroleum gas motor fuel, provided such other state or states provide for the furnishing of like information to this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 176, § 15; 2005, ch. 85, § 644, effective June 20, 2005.